Washington statutes.
RCW 31.20.040

Minimum capital stock.

No development credit corporation shall be organized with a capital stock of less than twenty-five thousand dollars, which shall be paid into the treasury of the corporation in cash before the corporation shall be authorized to transact any business other than such as relates to its organization.

[ 1959 c 213 s 4.]